Hawaii statutes.
§338-15 Late or altered certificates.
A person born in the State may file or amend a certificate after the time
prescribed, upon submitting proof as required by rules adopted by the
department of health. Certificates registered after the time prescribed for
filing by the rules of the department of health shall be registered subject to
any evidentiary requirements that the department adopts by rule to substantiate
the alleged facts of birth. [L 1949, c 327, §19; RL 1955, §57-18; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §19; HRS §338-15; am L 1972, c 66, §1(1); am L 1997, c 305, §2]

Attorney General Opinions

Section provides for the alteration of only birth
certificates. Att. Gen. Op. 84-14.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next